Utah statutes.
72-4-126.   State highways -- SR-201 to SR-204, SR-208 to SR-211.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-201.  From Route 80 at Lake Point Junction easterly to 900 West; then northerly to 2100 South Street; then easterly to Route 89.

(2)  SR-202.  From Route 201 near Garfield northwesterly through the Garfield Cutoff to Route 80.

(3)  SR-203.  From Route 89 near Uintah northerly on Harrison Boulevard in Ogden to Route 39.

(4)  SR-204.  From Route 26 north on Wall Avenue in Ogden to Route 89.

(5)  SR-208.  From Route 40 east of Fruitland northerly to Route 35 near Tabiona.

(6)  SR-209.  From Route 68 easterly on Ninetieth South Street; then easterly to Ninety-fourth South Street; then easterly to Route 210 near the mouth of Little Cottonwood Canyon.

(7)  SR-210.  From Route 190 at the mouth of Big Cottonwood Canyon southeasterly on Wasatch Boulevard and through Little Cottonwood Canyon, to Alta, including the Alta Bypass.

(8)  SR-211.  From Dugout Ranch southeasterly; then northeasterly to Route 191 near Church Rock.

